District of Columbia statutes.
29-1015.04

Approval or abandonment of merger by members.

(a)

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a plan of merger shall be approved by:

(1)

At least 2/3 of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under § 29-1015.03(b); and

(2)

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

(b)

The organic rules may provide that the percentage of votes under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be:

(1)

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

(2)

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

(3)

A combination of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.

(c)

The vote required to approve a plan of merger shall not be less than the vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend the articles of organization.

(d)

Consent in a record to a plan of merger by a member shall be delivered to the limited cooperative association before delivery of articles of merger for filing pursuant to § 29-1015.05 if as a result of the merger the member will have an obligation or liability for an additional contribution.

(e)

Subject to subsection (d) of this section and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before the effective date of the merger, a limited cooperative association that is a party to the merger may approve an amendment to the plan of merger or approve abandonment of the planned merger:

(1)

As provided in the plan; and

(2)

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the plan.

(f)

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under § 29-1004.04 shall apply to approval of a merger under this subchapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1608 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.